North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 4. Officers.

§ 55A-8-40.
Officers.

A corporation has the officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

A duly appointed officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The secretary or any assistant secretary or any one or more other officers designated by the bylaws or the board of directors shall have the responsibility and authority to maintain and authenticate the records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in a corporation, but no individual may act in more than one capacity where action of two or more officers is required.

Whenever a specific office is referred to in this Chapter, it shall be deemed to include any person who, individually or collectively with one or more other persons, holds or occupies such office.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 28; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-41.
Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the authority and duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the authority and duties of other officers.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 28; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section does not bring forward former G.S. 55A-25(c), which gave the chief executive officer authority to institute or defend legal proceedings when the directors were deadlocked. See the last paragraph of the North Carolina Commentary to

G.S. 55-8-41

.

Former G.S. 55A-26.2, which related to the authority of officers to execute corporate documents, was not brought forward because the substance of that section is covered by

G.S. 47-18.3

,

G.S. 47-41.01

,

G.S. 47-41.02

and general principles of agency law.

§ 55A-8-42.
Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge his duties under that authority:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging his duties, an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence.

An officer is not entitled to the benefit of subsection (b) of this section if the officer has actual knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) of this section unwarranted.

An officer is not liable for any action taken as an officer, or any failure to take any action, if the officer performed the duties of his office in compliance with this section.

An officer may be entitled to immunity under Part 6 of Article 8 of this Chapter or to indemnification against liability and expenses pursuant to Part 5 of Article 8 of this Chapter.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 29; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

The Model Act counterpart of this section contains a provision in subsection (b) explicitly allowing reliance on ministers, priests and other religious authorities in the case of religious corporations. That provision was rejected as unnecessary because the subject is adequately covered by subdivision (b)(2).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Duties of Nonprofit Corporate Directors - Emphasizing Oversight Responsibilities,” see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 1845 (2012).

§ 55A-8-43.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by communicating his resignation to the corporation. A resignation is effective when it is communicated unless it specifies in writing a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date and the corporation accepts the future effective date, its board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board of directors provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

A board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-8-44.
Contract rights of officers.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer’s removal does not affect the officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation does not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section makes clear that the appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights in the officer. The removal of an officer with contract rights is without prejudice to his later enforcement of contract rights in a suit for damages for breach of contract. See the Official Comment to

G.S. 55-8-43

. Similarly, an officer with an employment contract who prematurely resigns may be in breach of his employment contract. The mere appointment of an officer for a term does not create a contractual obligation on his part to complete the term.

§§ 55A-8-45 through 55A-8-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.